Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2544
Violations; penalty.

Any person who willfully violates sections 23-2534 to 23-2544 or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to sections 23-2534 to 23-2544 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 212, § 11.